Massachusetts, session 194th, H5612.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 19A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting before the second to last paragraph the 
following paragraph:- 
The department shall ensure that home care program services are made available to 
persons diagnosed with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis regardless of their age if they are otherwise 
eligible for such services.  
SECTION 2. The secretary of health and human services shall ensure that the relevant 
agencies under their purview, including the department of aging and independence, shall 
promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this act.